Massachusetts, session 194th, H792.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. There shall be a special commission to study and make recommendations to 
establish a statewide long-term services and supports benefit program in the commonwealth. The 
commission shall study: (i) whether and how a long-term serves and supports benefit program 
could be included as a benefit in the state disability insurance program structure, including but 
not limited to a nominal increase in the payroll tax; (ii) allowances for enrollment in the program 
of working adults who would make voluntary premium contributions either directly or through 
payroll deductions through their employer; (iii) requiring a mandatory enrollment with a 
voluntary opt-out option; (iv) giving adults the opportunity to plan for future long-term services 
and supports needs by providing a basic insurance benefit to those who meet requirements and 
have developed functional or equivalent cognitive limitations; (v) helping individuals with 
functional or cognitive limitations remain in their communities by purchasing nonmedical 

of 3 12 services and supports, including home health care and adult daycare; (vi) helping offset the costs 
incurred by adults with chronic and disabling conditions both for a defined period or until death. 
Section 2. The commission shall consist of the following 16 members: the secretary of 
health and human services or their designee, who shall serve as chair; the secretary of aging and 
independence or their designee; the commissioner of public health or their designee; the assistant 
secretary for MassHealth or their designee; the chairs of the joint committee on elder affairs or 
their designees; and 10 persons to be appointed by the governor: 1 of whom shall be a 
representative of the Home Care Aide Council, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the Home 
Care Alliance of Massachusetts, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a representative of Mass Aging Access, 
1 of whom shall be a representative of the Massachusetts Senior Care Association, Inc., 1 of 
whom shall be a representative of LeadingAge Massachusetts, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a 
representative of the Massachusetts chapter of AARP, 1 of whom shall be a representative of 
Local 1199 Service Employee International Union, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the 
National Association of Insurance and Financial Advisors of Massachusetts, 1 of whom shall be 
a representative of a long-term care insurance provider; and 1 of whom shall be an expert on 
long-term care and aging policy.   
Section 3. The commission shall review the independent actuarial study of financial 
options for modeling public, private and public-private hybrid long-term care services and 
supports authorized in item 4000-0300 Chapter 18 of the Acts of 2024 and conducted by 
Milliman, Inc.; and provided further shall utilize the findings of said actuarial study to make 
recommendations on: (i) how a statewide long-term services and supports benefit program could 
be designed and implemented to expand the options for people who are interested in insuring 
themselves against the risk of costs associated with functional or cognitive disability, and require 

of 3 35 long-term services and supports; (ii) options for the design of the program, including eligibility, 
enrollment, benefits, financing, administration, and interaction with MassHealth program and 
other publicly funded resources; (iii) how benefits under the program would be coordinated with 
existing private health care coverage benefits; (iv) the demands on the long-term care workforce 
as the need for long-term services and supports in Massachusetts grows, and how the long-term 
care workforce can be prepared to meet those demands; (v) the viability of a joint public and 
private system to make long-term services and supports accessible to as many individuals within 
Massachusetts as possible. 
Section 4. The commission shall submit a report containing its findings and 
recommendations, including drafts of proposed legislation to carry out its recommendations, by 
filing the same with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on 
elder affairs and the joint committee on health care financing no later than one year after the 
effective date of this act.